Maryland, session 2025, HB0916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
4–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHECKED BAG” MEANS BAGGAGE THAT IS STORED IN A STORAGE
COMPARTMENT OF A PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION VEHICLE AND INACCESSIBLE TO A
PERSON DURING TRAVEL.
(3) “EXTERNAL SAFETY LOCK” MEANS AN EXTERNAL DEVICE THAT IS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0916*

HOUSE BILL 916
(I) ATTACHED TO A FIREARM WITH A KEY OR COMBINATION
LOCK; AND
(II) DESIGNED TO PREVENT A FIREARM FROM BEING
DISCHARGED UNLESS THE DEVICE HAS BEEN DEACTIVATED.
(4) “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–104 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(5) “PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION” INCLUDES ANY FORM OF PUBLIC
TRANSPORT THAT IS AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC, INCLUDING:
(I) BUS SERVICE;
(II) TRAIN SERVICE;
(III) FERRY SERVICE; AND
(IV) AIRLINE SERVICE.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION IS AN ADDITION TO ANY EXISTING FEDERAL OR
STATE LAWS RELATING TO TRANSPORTING A FIREARM.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT TRANSPORT A FIREARM IN A CHECKED BAG
ON PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION IN THE STATE UNLESS THE FIREARM IS DISABLED
FROM DISCHARGING BY AN EXTERNAL SAFETY LOCK.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST CONVICTION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING
2 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH;
(II) FOR A SECOND CONVICTION, IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION,
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,000 OR
BOTH.
(2) EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS A SEPARATE CRIME.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.